Hawaii statutes.
§431:7-304 Record and receipt. (a)
The director of finance shall keep a record in permanent form of all such funds
and securities.

(b) The director of finance shall deliver to
the insurer a receipt for all funds and securities so deposited by it. [L 1987,
c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next